Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.015

Compensation and travel expenses of members—Executive director—Employees.

(1) Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. Members of the commission shall also be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties on the same basis as is provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) The commission shall appoint an executive director whose annual salary shall be determined under the provisions of RCW 43.03.028. The executive director shall perform such duties and have such powers as the commission shall prescribe in order to implement and enforce the provisions of this chapter. In addition to the performance of administrative duties, the commission may delegate to the executive director authority with respect to, but not limited to, representation proceedings, unfair labor practice proceedings, mediation of labor disputes, arbitration of disputes concerning the interpretation or application of a collective bargaining agreement, and, in certain cases, fact-finding or arbitration of disputes concerning the terms of a collective bargaining agreement. Such delegation shall not eliminate a party's right of appeal to the commission. The executive director, with such assistance as may be provided by the attorney general and such additional legal assistance consistent with chapter 43.10 RCW, shall have authority on behalf of the commission, when necessary to carry out or enforce any action or decision of the commission, to petition any court of competent jurisdiction for an order requiring compliance with the action or decision.

(3)(a) The commission shall employ such employees as it may from time to time find necessary for the proper performance of its duties, consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The employees of the commission shall also provide staff support to the legislative commission in carrying out the legislative commission's duties under chapter 44.90 RCW until the legislative commission expires on December 31, 2027, under RCW 41.58.100.

(4) The payment of all of the expenses of the commission, including travel expenses incurred by the members or employees of the commission under its orders, shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2024 c 333 s 18; 1984 c 287 s 71; 1979 ex.s. c 146 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 91; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 5 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.